District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.06

Procedure to contest validity or enforcement of registered order.

(a)

A nonregistering party seeking to contest the validity or enforcement of a registered order in the District shall request a hearing within 20 days after notice of the registration. The nonregistering party may seek to vacate the registration, to assert any defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order, or to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of any alleged arrearages pursuant to § 46-306.07.

(b)

If the nonregistering party fails to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner, the order is confirmed by operation of law.

(c)

If a nonregistering party requests a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order, the registering tribunal shall schedule the matter for hearing and give notice to the parties as to the date, time, and place of the hearing.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 606, 42 DCR 6748
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(k), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(6), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.6.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (a), deleted “(contest of registration or enforcement)” following “§ 46-306.07”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(k) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(k) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(k) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 29, 1998, 45 DCR 1950.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 606 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).